Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.310

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—Secretary, duties, compensation.

The secretary shall maintain an office at Olympia at a place to be provided, wherein the secretary shall:

(1) Keep a record of all proceedings of the state board, which shall be public;

(2) Maintain a record of all members of the pension fund, including such pertinent information relative thereto as may be required by law or rule of the state board;

(3) Receive and promptly remit to the state treasurer all moneys received for the principal fund;

(4) Transmit periodically to the proper state agency for payment all claims payable from the principal fund, stating the amount and purpose of such payment;

(5) Certify monthly for payment a list of all persons approved for retirement pensions and the amount to which each is entitled; and

(6) Perform such other and further duties as shall be prescribed by the state board.

The secretary shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the state board, together with travel expenses in carrying out his or her duties authorized by the state board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1999 c 148 s 27; 1989 c 91 s 24; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 88; 1969 c 118 s 10; 1955 c 263 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.